test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s68_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - æra: # 
    hvørva+V+Inf: hvørva
    hvørva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvørvir
    hvørva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [hvørvdi, hvørvdu]
    hvørva+V+Sup: hvørvt
    hvørva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hvørvdur
